Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Filing.

Sec. 45.29.501.
Filing office.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest or agricultural lien, the office in which to file a financing statement to perfect the security interest or agricultural lien is

the office designated for the recording of a mortgage on the related real property if

the collateral is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut; or

the financing statement is filed for record as a fixture filing and the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures; or

in all other cases, the central filing office of the Department of Natural Resources established under AS

44.37.027

, including a case in which the collateral consists of goods that are or are to become fixtures and the financing statement is not filed for record as a fixture filing.

The office in which to file a financing statement to perfect a security interest in collateral, including fixtures, of a transmitting utility is the central filing office of the Department of Natural Resources established under AS

44.37.027

. The financing statement also constitutes a fixture filing as to the collateral indicated in the financing statement that is or is to become fixtures.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.502.
Contents of financing statement; mortgage as financing statement; time of filing financing statement.

Subject to (b) of this section, a financing statement is sufficient only if it

provides the name of the debtor;

provides the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party; and

indicates the collateral covered by the financing statement.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.501(b)

, to be sufficient, a financing statement that covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, or that is filed as a fixture filing and covers goods that are or are to become fixtures, must

satisfy (a) of this section;

indicate that the financing statement covers this type of collateral;

indicate that the financing statement is to be filed for record in the real property records;

provide a description of the real property to which the collateral is related sufficient to give constructive notice of a mortgage under the law of this state if the description were contained in the mortgage of the real property; and

if the debtor does not have an interest of record in the real property, provide the name of a record owner.

A mortgage is effective from the date of recording as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut only if

the mortgage indicates the goods or accounts that it covers;

the goods are or are to become fixtures related to the real property described in the mortgage or the collateral is related to the real property described in the mortgage and is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut;

the mortgage satisfies the requirements for a financing statement in this section other than an indication that it is to be filed in the real property records; and

the mortgage is recorded.

A financing statement may be filed before a security agreement is made or a security interest otherwise attaches.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.503.
Name of debtor and secured party.

A financing statement sufficiently provides the name of the debtor

except as otherwise provided in (3) of this subsection, if the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a trust that is a registered organization, only if the financing statement provides the name that is stated to be the registered organization’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the registered organization’s jurisdiction of organization that purports to state, amend, or restate the registered organization’s name;

subject to (f) of this section, if the collateral is being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing statement, indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative;

if the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered organization, only if the financing statement

provides, as the name of the debtor,

if the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the trust, the name specified; or

if the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and

in a separate part of the financing statement,

if the name is provided in accordance with (A)(i) of this paragraph, indicates that the collateral is held in a trust; or

if the name is provided in accordance with (A)(ii) of this paragraph, provides additional information sufficient to distinguish the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust, unless the additional information so indicates;

if the debtor is an individual, only if the financing statement provides

the individual name of the debtor;

the surname and first personal name of the debtor; or

subject to (g) of this section, the name of the individual that is indicated on an unexpired driver’s license that this state has issued to the individual or on an unexpired identification card issued to the individual under AS

18.65.310

; and

in other cases, if the debtor

has a name, only if the financing statement provides the organizational name of the debtor; and

does not have a name, only if the financing statement provides the names of the partners, members, associates, or other persons of which the debtor is composed, in a manner that each name provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor.

A financing statement that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with (a) of this section is not rendered ineffective by the absence of

a trade name or other name of the debtor; or

unless required under (a)(5)(B) of this section, names of partners, members, associates, or other persons of which the debtor is composed.

A financing statement that provides only the debtor’s trade name does not sufficiently provide the name of the debtor.

Failure to indicate the representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.

A financing statement may provide the name of more than one debtor and the name of more than one secured party.

The name of the decedent indicated on the order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the name of the decedent under (a)(2) of this section.

If this state has issued to an individual more than one driver’s license, more than one identification card under AS

18.65.310

, or both an identification card under AS

18.65.310

and a driver’s license, the driver’s license or identification card that was issued the most recently is the one to which (a)(4)(C) of this section refers.

In this section, “name of the settlor or testator” means,

if the settlor is a registered organization, the name that is stated to be the settlor’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the settlor’s jurisdiction of organization that purports to state, amend, or restate the settlor’s name; or

in cases other than those described in (1) of this subsection, the name of the settlor or testator indicated in the trust’s organic record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a), substantially reorganizing the content and adding the more detailed information in (a)(4); in (b)(2), substituted “under (a)(5)(B)” for “under (a)(4)(B)”, substituted “of which the debtor is composed” for “comprising the debtor”; added (f) — (h).

Sec. 45.29.504.
Indication of collateral.

A financing statement sufficiently indicates the collateral that it covers if the financing statement provides

a description of the collateral pursuant to AS

45.29.108

; or

an indication that the financing statement covers all assets or all personal property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.505.
Filing and compliance with other statutes and treaties for consignments, leases, other bailments, and other transactions.

A consignor, lessor, or other bailor of goods, a licensor, or a buyer of a payment intangible or promissory note may file a financing statement or may comply with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in AS

45.29.311(a)

using the terms “consignor,” “consignee,” “lessor,” “lessee,” “bailor,” “bailee,” “licensor,” “licensee,” “owner,” “registered owner,” “buyer,” “seller,” or words of similar import instead of the terms “secured party” and “debtor.”

AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

apply to the filing of a financing statement under (a) of this section and, as appropriate, to compliance that is equivalent to filing a financing statement under AS

45.29.311(b)

, but the filing or compliance is not of itself a factor in determining whether the collateral secures an obligation. If it is determined for another reason that the collateral secures an obligation, a security interest held by the consignor, lessor, bailor, licensor, owner, or buyer that attaches to the collateral is perfected by the filing or compliance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.506.
Effect of errors or omissions.

A financing statement substantially satisfying the requirements of AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

is effective, even if it has minor errors or omissions, unless the errors or omissions make the financing statement seriously misleading.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with AS

45.29.503(a)

is seriously misleading.

If a search of the records of the filing office under the debtor’s correct name, using the filing office’s standard search logic, if any, would disclose a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with AS

45.29.503(a)

, the name provided does not make the financing statement seriously misleading.

For purposes of AS

45.29.508(b)

, the “debtor’s correct name” in (c) of this section means the correct name of the new debtor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.507.
Effect of certain events on effectiveness of financing statement.

A filed financing statement remains effective with respect to collateral that is sold, exchanged, leased, licensed, or otherwise disposed of and in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues even if the secured party knows of or consents to the disposition.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section and AS

45.29.508

, a financing statement is not rendered ineffective if, after the financing statement is filed, the information provided in the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under AS

45.29.506

.

If the name that a filed financing statement provides for a debtor becomes insufficient as the name of the debtor under AS

45.29.503(a)

so that the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under AS

45.29.506

, the financing statement is

effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor before, or within four months after, the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading; and

not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor more than four months after the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading, unless an amendment to the financing statement that renders the financing statement not seriously misleading is filed within four months after the financing statement becomes seriously misleading.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 20 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the introductory language in (c), which read “If a debtor changes its name sufficiently to cause a filed financing statement to become seriously misleading under AS

45.29.506

”; in (c)(1) and (c)(2), substituted “filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading” for “change” three times.

Sec. 45.29.508.
Effectiveness of financing statement if new debtor becomes bound by security agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a filed financing statement naming an original debtor is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights to the extent that the financing statement would have been effective had the original debtor acquired rights in the collateral.

If the difference between the name of the original debtor and that of the new debtor causes a filed financing statement that is effective under (a) of this section to be seriously misleading under AS

45.29.506

, the financing statement is

effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under AS

45.29.203(d)

; and

not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor more than four months after the new debtor becomes bound under AS

45.29.203(d)

unless an initial financing statement providing the name of the new debtor is filed before the expiration of that time.

This section does not apply to collateral as to which a filed financing statement remains effective against the new debtor under AS

45.29.507(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.509.
Persons entitled to file a record.

A person may file an initial financing statement, amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement, or amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if

the debtor authorizes the filing in an authenticated record or pursuant to (b) or (c) of this section; or

the person holds an agricultural lien that has become effective at the time of filing and the financing statement covers only collateral in which the person holds an agricultural lien.

By authenticating or becoming bound as debtor by a security agreement, a debtor or new debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement and an amendment covering

the collateral described in the security agreement; and

property that becomes collateral under AS

45.29.315(a)(2)

, whether or not the security agreement expressly covers proceeds.

By acquiring collateral in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues under AS

45.29.315(a)(1)

, a debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering the collateral and property that becomes collateral under AS

45.29.315(a)(2)

.

A person may file an amendment other than an amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement or an amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if

the secured party of record authorizes the filing; or

the amendment is a termination statement for a financing statement as to which the secured party of record has failed to file or send a termination statement required under AS

45.29.513(a)

or (c), the debtor authorizes the filing, and the termination statement indicates that the debtor authorized it to be filed.

If there is more than one secured party of record for a financing statement, each secured party of record may authorize the filing of an amendment under (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.510.
Effectiveness of filed record.

A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person who may file it under AS

45.29.509

.

A record authorized by one secured party of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another secured party of record.

A continuation statement that is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by AS

45.29.515(d)

is ineffective.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.511.
Secured party of record.

A secured party of record with respect to a financing statement is a person whose name is provided as the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party in an initial financing statement that has been filed. If an initial financing statement is filed under AS

45.29.514(a)

, the assignee named in the initial financing statement is the secured party of record with respect to the financing statement.

If an amendment of a financing statement that provides the name of a person as a secured party or a representative of a secured party is filed, the person named in the amendment is a secured party of record. If an amendment is filed under AS

45.29.514(b)

, the assignee named in the amendment is a secured party of record.

A person remains a secured party of record until the filing of an amendment of the financing statement that deletes the person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.512.
Amendment of financing statement.

Subject to AS

45.29.509

, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or, subject to (e) of this section, otherwise amend the information provided in, a financing statement by filing an amendment that

identifies by its file number the initial financing statement to which the amendment relates; and

if the amendment relates to an initial financing statement filed or recorded in a filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

, provides the date that the initial financing statement was filed or recorded and the information specified in AS

45.29.502(b)

.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.515

, the filing of an amendment does not extend the period of effectiveness of the financing statement.

A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds collateral is effective as to the added collateral only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds a debtor is effective as to the added debtor only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

An amendment is ineffective to the extent it purports to delete all

debtors and fails to provide the name of a debtor to be covered by the financing statement; or

secured parties of record and fails to provide the name of a new secured party of record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.513.
Termination statement.

A secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to file a termination statement for the financing statement if the financing statement covers consumer goods and

there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

the debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

To comply with (a) of this section, a secured party shall cause the secured party of record to file the termination statement

within one month after there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

if earlier, within 20 days after the secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor.

In cases not governed by (a) of this section, within 20 days after a secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor, the secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to send to the debtor a termination statement for the financing statement or file the termination statement in the filing office if

except in the case of a financing statement covering accounts or chattel paper that has been sold or goods that are the subject of a consignment, there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value;

the financing statement covers accounts or chattel paper that has been sold but as to which the account debtor or other person obligated has discharged its obligation;

the financing statement covers goods that were the subject of a consignment to the debtor but are not in the debtor’s possession; or

the debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.510

, upon the filing of a termination statement in the filing office, the financing statement to which the termination statement relates ceases to be effective. Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.510

, for purposes of AS

45.29.519(g)

,

45.29.522(a)

, and

45.29.523(c)

, the filing in the filing office of a termination statement relating to a financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a transmitting utility also causes the effectiveness of the financing statement to lapse.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.514.
Assignment of powers of secured party of record.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, an initial financing statement may reflect an assignment of all of the secured party’s power to authorize an amendment to the financing statement by providing the name and mailing address of the assignee as the name and address of the secured party.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, a secured party of record may assign of record all or part of its power to authorize an amendment to a financing statement by filing in the filing office an amendment of the financing statement that

identifies by its file number the initial financing statement to which it relates;

provides the name of the assignor; and

provides the name and mailing address of the assignee.

An assignment of record of a security interest in a fixture covered by a mortgage that is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under AS

45.29.502(c)

may be made only by an assignment of record of the mortgage in the manner provided by law of this state other than the code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.515.
Duration and effectiveness of financing statement; effect of lapsed financing statement.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) and (e) — (g) of this section, a filed financing statement is effective for a period of five years after the date of filing.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) — (g) of this section, an initial financing statement filed in connection with a manufactured home transaction is effective for a period of 30 years after the date of filing if it indicates that it is filed in connection with a manufactured home transaction.

The effectiveness of a filed financing statement lapses on the expiration of the period of its effectiveness unless, before the lapse, a continuation statement is filed under (d) of this section. Upon lapse, a financing statement ceases to be effective and a security interest or agricultural lien that was perfected by the financing statement becomes unperfected unless the security interest is perfected otherwise. If the security interest or agricultural lien becomes unperfected upon lapse, it is considered never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

A continuation statement may be filed only within six months before the expiration of the five-year period specified in (a) of this section or the 30-year period specified in (b) of this section, whichever is applicable.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.510

, upon timely filing of a continuation statement, the effectiveness of the initial financing statement continues for a period of five years commencing on the day on which the financing statement would have become ineffective in the absence of the filing. Upon the expiration of the five-year period, the financing statement lapses in the same manner as provided in (c) of this section unless, before the lapse, another continuation statement is filed under (d) of this section. Succeeding continuation statements may be filed in the same manner to continue the effectiveness of the initial financing statement.

If a debtor is a transmitting utility and a filed financing statement so indicates, the initial financing statement is effective until a termination statement is filed.

A mortgage that is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under AS

45.29.502(c)

remains effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing until the mortgage is released or satisfied of record or its effectiveness otherwise terminates as to the real property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 21 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (f), inserted “initial” preceding “financing statement”.

Sec. 45.29.516.
What constitutes filing; effectiveness of filing.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, communication of a record to a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the record by the filing office constitutes filing.

Filing does not occur with respect to a record that a filing office refuses to accept because

the record is not communicated by a method or medium of communication authorized by the filing office;

an amount equal to or greater than the applicable filing fee is not tendered;

the filing office is unable to index the record because, in the case of

an initial financing statement, the record does not provide a name for the debtor;

an amendment or information statement, the record

does not identify the initial financing statement as required by AS

45.29.512

or

45.29.518

, as applicable; or

identifies an initial financing statement whose effectiveness has lapsed under AS

45.29.515

;

an initial financing statement that provides the name of a debtor identified as an individual or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an individual that was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor’s surname;

a record filed in the filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

that relates to real property, the record does not provide a sufficient description of the real property to which it relates; or

a fixture filing or other filing allowed to be filed for record in a filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

, the filing does not provide the name of the debtor and record owner;

in the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that adds a secured party of record, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the secured party of record;

in the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor that was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, the record does not

provide a mailing address for the debtor; or

indicate whether the name provided as the name of the debtor is the name of an individual or an organization;

in the case of an assignment reflected in an initial financing statement under AS

45.29.514(a)

or an amendment filed under AS

45.29.514(b)

, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the assignee;

in the case of a continuation statement, the record is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by AS

45.29.515

(d); or

the record is not communicated on a form authorized by filing office regulation.

For purposes of (b) of this section, a record

does not provide information if the filing office is unable to read or decipher the information; and

that does not indicate that it is an amendment or identify an initial financing statement to which it relates as required by AS

45.29.512

,

45.29.514

, or

45.29.518

is an initial financing statement.

A record that is communicated to the filing office with tender of the filing fee, but which the filing office refuses to accept for a reason other than one set out in (b) of this section, is effective as a filed record except as against a purchaser of the collateral who gives value in reasonable reliance on the absence of the record from the files.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 76 SLA 2008; am § 22 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (b)(3)(B), substituted “information” for “correction, in (b)(3)(C), substituted “surname” for “last name”; rewrote (b)(5)(B), which read “indicate whether the debtor is an individual or an organization”, deleted (b)(5)(C), which pertained to information a debtor organization was required to provide.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Uniform Commercial Code does not impose any responsibility on the filing officer for determining the legal sufficiency of statements presented for filing. The minimum acceptance criterion for each separate type of UCC filing is that it contain the elements required by the statutory requirement for each specific document; the filing officer does not have responsibility to determine whether or not the elements required for the document have been properly completed.
July 16, 1997 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 45.29.517.
Effect of indexing errors.

The failure of the filing office to index a record correctly does not affect the effectiveness of the filed record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.518.
Claim concerning inaccurate or wrongfully filed record.

A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record indexed there under the person’s name if the person believes that the record is inaccurate or was wrongfully filed.

An information statement under (a) of this section must

identify the record to which it relates by

the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates; and

if the information statement relates to a record filed for record in a filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

, the date that the initial financing statement was filed for record and the information specified in AS

45.29.502(b)

;

indicate that it is an information statement; and

provide the basis for the person’s belief that the record is inaccurate and indicate the manner in which the person believes the record should be amended to cure the inaccuracy or provide the basis for the person’s belief that the record was wrongfully filed.

The filing of an information statement does not affect the effectiveness of an initial financing statement or other filed record.

A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record filed there if the person is a secured party of record with respect to the financing statement to which the record relates and believes that the person that filed the record was not entitled to file the record under AS

45.29.509(d)

.

An information statement under (d) of this section must

identify the record to which it relates

by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates; and

if the information statement relates to a record filed in a filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

, by the date that the initial financing statement was filed and the information specified in AS

45.29.502(b)

;

indicate that it is an information statement; and

provide the basis for the person’s belief that the person that filed the record was not entitled to file the record under AS

45.29.509(d)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am §§ 23, 24 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in the introductory language in (b), inserted “under (a) of this section” following “statement”; substituted “an information” for “a correction” five times throughout the section; added (d) and (e).

Sec. 45.29.519.
Numbering, maintaining, and indexing records; communicating information provided in records.

For each record filed in a filing office, the filing office shall

assign a unique number to the filed record;

create a record that bears the number assigned to the filed record and the date and time of filing;

maintain the filed record for public inspection; and

index the filed record in accordance with (c) — (e) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in (i) of this section, a file number assigned after January 1, 2002, must include a digit that

is mathematically derived from or related to the other digits of the file number; and

aids the filing office in determining whether a number communicated as the file number includes a single digit or transpositional error.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) and (e) of this section, the filing office shall index

an initial financing statement according to the name of the debtor and index all filed records relating to the initial financing statement in a manner that associates with one another an initial financing statement and all filed records relating to the initial financing statement; and

a record that provides a name of a debtor that was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates also according to the name that was not previously provided.

If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, it must be filed for record and the filing office shall index it

under the names of the debtor and of each owner of record shown on the financing statement as if they were the mortgagors under a mortgage of the real property described; and

to the extent that the law of this state provides for indexing of mortgages under the name of the mortgagee, under the name of the secured party as if the secured party were the mortgagee thereunder, or, if indexing is by description, as if the financing statement were a mortgage of the real property described.

If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, the filing office shall index an assignment filed under AS

45.29.514(a)

or an amendment filed under AS

45.29.514(b)

under the name of the assignor as grantor; and

to the extent that the law of this state provides for indexing a record of the assignment of a mortgage under the name of the assignee, under the name of the assignee.

The filing office shall maintain a capability to

retrieve a record by the name of the debtor and, if the filing office is described in

AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

, by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates and the date that the record was filed for record; or

AS

45.29.501(a)(2)

, by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates; and

associate and retrieve with one another an initial financing statement and each filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

The filing office may not remove a debtor’s name from the index until one year after the effectiveness of a financing statement naming the debtor lapses under AS

45.29.515

with respect to all secured parties of record.

Except as otherwise provided in (i) of this section, the filing office shall perform the acts required by (a) — (e) of this section at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office regulations, but not later than two business days after the filing office receives the record in question.

The requirements of (b) and (h) of this section do not apply to a filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.520.
Acceptance and refusal to accept record.

A filing office shall refuse to accept a record for filing for a reason set out in AS

45.29.516(b)

and may refuse to accept a record for filing only for a reason set out in AS

45.29.516(b)

.

If a filing office refuses to accept a record for filing, the filing office shall communicate to the person who presented the record the fact of and reason for the refusal and the date and time the record would have been filed had the filing office accepted it. The communication must be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office regulation but, in the case of a filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(2)

, no more than two business days after the filing office receives the record.

A filed financing statement satisfying AS

45.29.502(a)

and (b) is effective even if the filing office is required to refuse to accept it for filing under (a) of this section. However, AS

45.29.338

applies to a filed financing statement providing information described in AS

45.29.516(b)(5)

that is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed.

If a record communicated to a filing office provides information that relates to more than one debtor, AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

applies as to each debtor separately.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.521.
Uniform form of written financing statement and amendment. [Repealed, § 5 ch 76 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 45.29.522.
Maintenance and destruction of records.

The filing office shall maintain a record of the information provided in a filed financing statement for at least one year after the effectiveness of the financing statement has lapsed under AS

45.29.515

with respect to all secured parties of record. The record must be retrievable by using the name of the debtor and,

if the record was filed for record in the filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(1)

, by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates and the date that the record was filed for record; or

if the record was filed in the filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(2)

, by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

Except to the extent that a statute governing disposition of public records provides otherwise, the filing office immediately may destroy a written record evidencing a financing statement. However, if the filing office destroys a written record, it shall maintain another record of the financing statement that complies with (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.